ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră: Cutii pentru arcușuri instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră; Arcușuri instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră; Cutii instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră; Accesorii și piese pentru instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră; Surdine pentru instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră; Doze pentru instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră; Stative pentru instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră; Coarde pentru instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strengeinstrumenter – tilbehør > Tilbehør til strygeinstrumenter: Buekasser til strengeinstrumenter; Buer til strygeinstrumenter; Etuier til strygeinstrumenter; Tilbehør og dele til strygeinstrumenter; Dæmpere til strygeinstrumenter; Pickupper til strygeinstrumenter; Stativer til strygeinstrumenter; Strenge til strygeinstrumenter
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > String Instrument Accessories > Orchestral String Instrument Accessories: Orchestral String Instrument Bow Cases; Orchestral String Instrument Bows; Orchestral String Instrument Cases; Orchestral String Instrument Fittings & Parts; Orchestral String Instrument Mutes; Orchestral String Instrument Pickups; Orchestral String Instrument Stands; Orchestral String Instrument Strings
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr: Futerały na smyczki; Smyczki do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr; Futerały na instrumenty strunowe dla orkiestr; Części i osprzęt do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr; Tłumiki do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr; Przystawki do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr; Stojaki do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr; Struny do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de cordas > Acessórios de instrumento de cordas de orquestra: Estojos para arcos de instrumento de cordas de orquestra; Arcos de instrumento de cordas de orquestra; Estojos de instrumento de cordas de orquestra; Encaixes e peças de instrumento de cordas de orquestra; Surdinas de instrumento de cordas de orquestra; Captadores pickups de instrumento de cordas de orquestra; Suportes de instrumento de cordas de orquestra; Cordas de instrumento de cordas de orquestra
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Jousisoitintarvikkeet > Orkestraaliset jousisoitin­tarvikkeet: Jousisoitinten jousikotelot; Jousisoitinten jouset; Jousisoitinkotelot; Jousisoitinten osat; Jousisoitinten vaimentimet; Jousisoitinmikrofonit; Jousisoitintelineet; Jousisoitinten kielet
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 현악기 부대용품 > 오케스트라 현악기 부대용품: 오케스트라 현악기 활 케이스; 오케스트라 현악기 활; 오케스트라 현악기 케이스; 오케스트라 현악기 피팅용품/부품; 오케스트라 현악기 뮤트; 오케스트라 현악기 픽업; 오케스트라 현악기 스탠드; 오케스트라 현악기 스트링
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre sláčikové nástroje > Príslušenstvo k orchestrálnym sláčikovým nástrojom: Puzdrá na orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje; Puzdrá na orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje; Puzdrá na orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje; Príslušenstvo a diely pre orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje; Dusítka pre orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje; Snímače pre orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje; Stojany na orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje; Struny pre orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Aksesuarları: Telli Çalgı Çantaları; Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Yayları; Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Kılıfları; Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Bağlantı Elemanları ve Parçaları; Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Susturucular; Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Alıcıları; Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Standları; Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Telleri
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสาย > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา: กล่องเก็บคันสีของเครื่องสายวงออร์เคสตรา; คันชักสำหรับเครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา; กล่องใส่เครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา; อุปกรณ์และชิ้นส่วนสำหรับเครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา; ที่ลดเสียงสำหรับเครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา; ปิคอัพสำหรับเครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา; ที่วางเครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา; สายของเครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для струнных инструментов > Аксессуары для оркестровых струнных инструментов: Футляры для смычков для оркестровых струнных инструментов; Смычки для оркестровых струнных инструментов; Футляры для оркестровых струнных инструментов; Фурнитура и детали для оркестровых струнных инструментов; Сурдины для оркестровых струнных инструментов; Звукосниматели для оркестровых струнных инструментов; Стойки для оркестровых струнных инструментов; Струны для оркестровых струнных инструментов
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Smyčcové nástroje – příslušenství > Příslušenství ke koncertním smyčcovým nástrojům: Pouzdra na smyčce; Smyčce ke koncertním smyčcovým nástrojům; Pouzdra na koncertní smyčcové nástroje; Náhradní díly na koncertní smyčcové nástroje; Dusítka na koncertní smyčcové nástroje; Snímače pro koncertní smyčcové nástroje; Stojany na koncertní smyčcové nástroje; Struny pro koncertní smyčcové nástroje
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 弦楽器用品 > オーケストラ弦楽器関連用品: 弦楽器弓ケース; オーケストラ弦楽器用弓; オーケストラ弦楽器用ケース; オーケストラ弦楽器用備品・パーツ; オーケストラ弦楽器用ミュート; オーケストラ弦楽器用ピックアップ; オーケストラ弦楽器用スタンド; オーケストラ弦楽器用弦
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor snaarinstrumenten > Accessoires voor strijkinstrumenten: Koffers voor snaarinstrumenten; Strijkstokken; Koffers en kisten voor strijkinstrumenten; Onderdelen voor strijkinstrumenten; Dempers voor strijkinstrumenten; Elementen voor strijkinstrumenten; Standaarden voor strijkinstrumenten; Snaren voor strijkinstrumenten
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za gudačka glazbala > Pribor za orkestralna žičana glazbala: Koferi za gudala orkestralnih žičanih glazbala; Gudala za orkestralna žičana glazbala; Koferi za orkestralna žičana glazbala; Oprema i dijelovi za orkestralna žičana glazbala; Sordine za orkestralna žičana glazbala; Pickupi za orkestralna žičana glazbala; Stalci za orkestralna žičana glazbala; Žice za orkestralna žičana glazbala
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta: Estuches para arcos de instrumentos de cuerda; Arcos para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta; Estuches para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta; Piezas y equipamiento para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta; Sordinas para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta; Pastillas para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta; Bases para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta; Cuerdas para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Styginių instrumentų priedai > Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų priedai: Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų strykų dėklai; Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų strykai; Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų dėklai; Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų priedai ir dalys; Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų surdinos; Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų garso ėmikliai; Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų stovai; Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų stygos
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 弦樂器配件 > 管弦弦樂器配件: 琴弓盒; 弦樂器弓; 弦樂器盒; 弦樂器零件; 弦樂器弱音器; 弦樂器拾音器; 弦樂器支架; 弦樂器弦線
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za godala > Dodatki za orkestrska godala: Kovčki za loke za orkestrska godala; Loki za orkestrska godala; Kovčki za orkestrska godala; Priključki in deli za orkestrska godala; Kovčki za orkestrska godala; Odjemalci zvoka za orkestrska godala; Stojala za orkestrska godala; Strune za orkestrska godala
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori strumenti a corda > Accessori per strumenti ad arco: Custodie per archetti di strumenti a corda; Archetti per strumenti ad arco; Custodie per strumenti ad arco; Componenti e accessori per strumenti ad arco; Sordine per strumenti ad arco; Pickup per strumenti ad arco; Supporti per strumenti ad arco; Corde per strumenti ad arco
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda para orquestras: Estojos para arcos de instrumentos de corda; Arcos para instrumentos de corda para orquestras; Estojos para instrumentos de corda para orquestras; Acessórios e peças para instrumentos de corda para orquestras; Surdinas para instrumentos de corda para orquestras; Captadores sonoros para instrumentos de corda para orquestras; Suportes para instrumentos de corda para orquestras; Cordas para instrumentos de corda para orquestras
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till stränginstrument > Tillbehör till orkesterstränginstrument: Bågfodral till stränginstrument; Stråkar till orkesterstränginstrument; Fodral till orkesterstränginstrument; Tillbehör och delar till orkesterstränginstrument; Sordiner för orkesterstränginstrument; Pickuper till orkesterstränginstrument; Ställ till orkesterstränginstrument; Strängar till orkesterstränginstrument
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til strengeinstrumenter > Tilbehør til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter: Bueesker til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter; Buer til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter; Kasser til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter; Utstyr og deler til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter; Muter til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter; Pickups til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter; Stativer til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter; Strenger til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за струнни инструменти > Аксесоари за оркестрови струнни инструменти: Калъфи за лъкове за оркестрови струнни инструменти; Лъкове за оркестрови струнни инструменти; Калъфи за оркестрови струнни инструменти; Аксесоари и части за оркестрови струнни инструменти; Заглушители за оркестрови струнни инструменти; Пикапи за оркестрови струнни инструменти; Стойки за оркестрови струнни инструменти; Струни за оркестрови струнни инструменти
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Saiteninstrumente > Zubehör für Streichinstrumente & Harfen: Bogenkästen für Streichinstrumente; Bögen für Saiteninstrumente; Koffer für Saiteninstrumente; Zubehör & Ersatzteile für Saiteninstrumente; Dämpfer für Saiteninstrumente; Tonabnehmer für Saiteninstrumente; Ständer für Saiteninstrumente; Saiten für Saiteninstrumente
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ εγχόρδων οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων: Θήκες δοξαριών ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων; Δοξάρια ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων; Θήκες ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων; Εξαρτήματα & ανταλλακτικά ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων; Σιγαστήρες ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων; Μαγνήτες ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων; Βάσεις ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων; Χορδές ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre: Étuis pour archets; Archets pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre; Étuis pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre; Pièces pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre; Sourdines pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre; Cellules magnétiques pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre; Supports pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre; Cordes pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện dành cho nhạc cụ dây > Phụ kiện nhạc cụ dây trong dàn nhạc: Hộp đựng vĩ của nhạc cụ dây; Cây kéo nhạc cụ dây; Hộp đựng nhạc cụ dây; Bộ phận và phụ kiện của nhạc cụ dây; Thiết bị chặn tiếng của nhạc cụ dây; Thiết bị thu nhận âm thanh của nhạc cụ dây; Giá đỡ nhạc cụ dây trong dàn nhạc; Dây nhạc cụ dây trong dàn nhạc
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-kiegészítők > Zenekarivonóshangszer-kiegészítők: Zenekarivonóshangszer-vonótokok; Zenekarivonóshangszer-vonók; Zenekarivonóshangszer-tokok; Zenekarivonóshangszer-szerelvények és -alkatrészek; Zenekarivonóshangszer-némítók; Zenekarivonóshangszer-hangszedők; Zenekarivonóshangszer-tartók; Zenekarivonóshangszer-húrok
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 弦乐器配件 > 管弦乐器配件: 管弦乐器弓盒; 管弦乐器琴弓; 管弦乐器包; 管弦乐器配件和部件; 管弦乐器弱音器; 管弦乐器拾音器; 管弦乐器支架; 管弦乐器琴弦